Maryland, session 2026, HB1515.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
3–716.
(a) (1) This subsection applies:
(i) to an employment contract or a similar document or agreement
concerning:
1. an employee who earns equal to or less than 150% of the
State minimum wage rate established under § 3–413 of this title;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1515*

HOUSE BILL 1515
2. employment in a position for which the employee:
A. is required to be licensed under the Health Occupations
Article;
B. is employed in a position that provides direct patient care;
and
C. earns equal to or less than $350,000 in total annual
compensation;
3. AN EMPLOYEE OF AN EMPLOYER THAT:
A. AT ANY TIME DURING THE EMPLOYEE’S EMPLOYMENT
EMPLOYS MORE THAN 30 EMPLOYEES, THE MAJORITY OF WHOM ARE LOCATED IN
THE STATE; AND
B. SUBSEQUENT TO THE EMPLOYEE LEAVING THE
EMPLOYMENT OF THE EMPLOYER, RELOCATES THE MAJORITY OF ITS EMPLOYEES
OR ITS PRINCIPAL PLACE OF BUSINESS OUTSIDE THE STATE; or
[3.] 4. an employee licensed as a veterinary practitioner or
veterinary technician under Title 2, Subtitle 3 of the Agriculture Article; and
(ii) whether or not the employer and employee entered into the
employment contract or similar document or agreement in the State.
(2) This subsection does not apply to an employment contract or a similar
document or agreement with respect to the taking or use of a client or patient list or other
proprietary client–related or patient–related information.
(3) A noncompete or conflict of interest provision in an employment
contract or a similar document or agreement that restricts the ability of an employee to
enter into employment with a new employer or to become self–employed in the same or
similar business or trade shall be null and void as being against the public policy of the
State.
(b) (1) This subsection applies only to an employment contract or similar
document or agreement concerning employment in a position for which the employee:
(i) is required to be licensed under the Health Occupations Article;
(ii) is employed in a position that provides direct patient care; and
(iii) earns more than $350,000 in total annual compensation.

HOUSE BILL 1515 3
(2) (i) The period for which a noncompete or conflict of interest
provision in an employment contract or similar document or agreement is in effect may not
exceed 1 year from the last day of employment.
(ii) The geographical restriction in a noncompete or conflict of
interest provision in an employment contract or similar document or agreement may not
exceed 10 miles from the primary place of employment.
(3) On request of a patient, an employer of an employee described in
paragraph (1) of this subsection shall provide notice to a patient of the new location where
a former employee will be practicing.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That § 3–716(a)(1)(i)3 of the Labor
and Employment Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, shall be construed to apply
only to employment contracts or similar documents or agreements for employment executed
on or after the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.